Ohio, session 136, SB119.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5534.967 of the Revised Code be 4
enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 5534.967. In addition to any other name prescribed i n 6
the Revised Code or otherwise, the eastbound and westbound lanes 7
of United States route number thirty-six between interstate 8
seventy-one and South Galena road, in Delaware county, shall be 9
known as the "Freedom Parkway." 10
The director of transportation may erect suitable markers 11
along the highway indicating its name. 12